Massachusetts, session 194th, H3524.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2012 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after Section 76D the following section:-Section 76 E.(a) As used in this
section, the following words shall, unless the context otherwise requires, have the following
meanings:-
“Company,” a gas or distribution company
“Contract," any agreement for the procurement of services specified under subsection
(b),regardless of what the parties call the agreement.
“Responsible Bidder,” a person who has the capability to perform fully the contract
requirements, and the integrity and reliability which assures good faith performance.
of 3

“Score,” the quantities or qualitatively rating or method utilized by the company to
award a contract
(b) When entering into a contract in the amount of $100,000 or more for services related
to the excavation or construction upon, along, or across any public way, each company shall be
subject to this section.
(c) A company shall(1) within two business days after the decision has been made,inform
any responsible bidder which submitted a bid of its decision in relation to the award of a
contract, and shall do so by notice in writing by the most rapid means of communication
possible; and (2) post on their website (i)name of the contractor, (ii)location of project,(iii)
duration of work.
(d) The written notice to each responsible bidder shall include (1) The criteria for the
award of the contract; and (2) the score obtained by the responsible bidder; and (3) winning
amount.
(e) Where there is only one response to a solicitation, a company need not comply with
this section.
(f) A company may withhold any information to be provided in accordance with the
section where disclosure of such information (1) would impede law enforcement,(2) would
otherwise be contrary to the public interest, (3) would prejudice the legitimate commercial
interests of any responsible bidder; or (4) might interfere with competition between responsible
bidders.
of 3

(g) The department shall be responsible for enforcing this section , and may promulgate
regulations and issue orders it deems in the public interest regarding the procurement practices of
companies.
of 3